Maryland, session 2025, SB0642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–401.2.
(a) [(1) In this section, “recreational facility” means a commercial recreational
facility, a commercial athletic facility, or an amusement attraction.
(2) “Recreational facility” includes:
(i) Gymnasiums; and
(ii) Swimming pools.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0642*

SENATE BILL 642
(3) “Recreational facility” does not include:
(i) A lodging establishment, as defined in § 15–201 of the Business
Regulation Article, unless the lodging establishment owns, maintains, or operates a
recreational facility that is available for use by the general public; or
(ii) A unit of State or local government that leases land or facilities
to a recreational facility.
(b) This section does not apply to a health club services agreement, as defined in
§ 14–12B–01 of the Commercial Law Article, for services to be rendered for an adult.
(c)] Any provision in a contract or agreement relating to the use of [a recreational
facility] AN INDOOR TRAMPOLINE PARK that purports to limit the [recreational facility’s]
INDOOR TRAMPOLINE PARK’S liability, or release the [recreational facility] INDOOR
TRAMPOLINE PARK from or indemnify or hold harmless the [recreational facility]
INDOOR TRAMPOLINE PARK against liability, for injury caused by or resulting from the
negligence or other wrongful act of the [recreational facility] INDOOR TRAMPOLINE PARK
or its agents or on–duty employees is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.
[(d)] (B) This section may not be interpreted to affect, extend, or limit the
liability of a governmental entity for a tort or other claim subject to Title 12, Subtitle 1 of
the State Government Article or Subtitle 3 of this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.